Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8281. EAST CEDAR CREEK FRESH WATER SUPPLY DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8281.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the East Cedar Creek Fresh Water Supply District.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8281.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Henderson County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8281.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the boundaries of the district will benefit from the works and projects that are to be accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8281.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 2, Chapter 696, Acts of the 65th Legislature, Regular Session, 1977, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in copying the field notes in the legislative process or any other mistake in the field notes does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to issue any type of bond for a purpose for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on a bond;

(3) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(4) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8281.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board of directors of the district is composed of seven elected directors.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8281.052. VACANCIES. The Commissioners Court of Henderson County shall appoint directors to fill all vacancies on the board when the number of qualified directors is fewer than four.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8281.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, and functions provided by general law applicable to a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8281.102. WATER AND SEWER SYSTEMS. (a) The district may acquire, and may improve or extend, any existing water or sewer system that serves all or part of the district territory or may construct a water or sewer system to serve the inhabitants of the county in which the district is located.

(b) A contract to acquire an existing water or sewer facility may be made on terms approved by the contracting parties.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8281.103. LIMITATION ON PROVIDING WATER TO CERTAIN USERS. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the district may not compete with the City of Mabank in providing water to household users unless the district receives permission from the Public Utility Commission of Texas, with the consent of that city.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8281.104. AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS. The district may produce agricultural products other than livestock on property the district owns or controls and may market those products.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8281.105. VOTER APPROVAL OF TAXES REQUIRED. The district may not impose a tax unless the tax has been approved by the voters at an election called for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.